testing/kom-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../bin/kom-gen.hfst
    Morph: ../bin/kom-mor.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../bin/ikom.fst
    Morph: ../bin/kom.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - кывны: # Verb1
     кывны+V+ConNeg+Pl3: кывны
     кывны+V+ConNeg: кыв
     кывны+V+Imprt+Sg2: кыв
     кывны+V+Imprt+Pl2: кылӧй
     кывны+V+Inf+NoComparison: кывны
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+NoComparison: кыла
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+NoComparison: кылан
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+NoComparison: кылӧ
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+NoComparison: [кылам, кыламӧй]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кыламӧ
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+NoComparison: кыланныд
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кылад
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+NoComparison: кылӧны
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+NoComparison: кыла
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+NoComparison: кылан
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+NoComparison: кылас
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+NoComparison: [кылам, кыламӧй]
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кыламӧ
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+NoComparison: кыланныд
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кылад
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+NoComparison: кыласны
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+NoComparison: кылі
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+NoComparison: кылін
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+NoComparison: [кыліс, кылі]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+NoComparison: [кылім, кылімӧй]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кылімӧ
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+NoComparison: кылінныд
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Use/Sub+NoComparison: кылід
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+NoComparison: [кылісны, кыліны]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1+NoComparison: кылӧма
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+NoComparison: кылӧмыд
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+NoComparison: кылӧма
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1+NoComparison: кылӧмаӧсь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+NoComparison: [кылӧмныд, кылӧмныдӧсь]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+NoComparison: [кылӧмаӧсь, кылӧмны]
     кывны+V+Inf+Der/моз: кывнымоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Der/моз: кыламоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Der/моз: кыланмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Der/моз: кылӧмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Der/моз: [кыламмоз, кыламӧймоз]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кыламӧмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Der/моз: кыланныдмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кыладмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Der/моз: кылӧнымоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+Der/моз: кыламоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+Der/моз: кыланмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+Der/моз: кыласмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Der/моз: [кыламмоз, кыламӧймоз]
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кыламӧмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Der/моз: кыланныдмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кыладмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+Der/моз: кыласнымоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+Der/моз: кылімоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+Der/моз: кылінмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Der/моз: [кылісмоз, кылімоз]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Der/моз: [кыліммоз, кылімӧймоз]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кылімӧмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Der/моз: кылінныдмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/моз: кылідмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+Der/моз: [кыліснымоз, кылінымоз]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1+Der/моз: кылӧмамоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+Der/моз: кылӧмыдмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+Der/моз: кылӧмамоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1+Der/моз: кылӧмаӧсьмоз
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+Der/моз: [кылӧмныдмоз, кылӧмныдӧсьмоз]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+Der/моз: [кылӧмаӧсьмоз, кылӧмнымоз]
     кывны+V+Inf+Der/кодь: кывныкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Der/кодь: кылакодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Der/кодь: кыланкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Der/кодь: кылӧкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Der/кодь: [кыламкодь, кыламӧйкодь]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кыламӧкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Der/кодь: кыланныдкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кыладкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Der/кодь: кылӧныкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+Der/кодь: кылакодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+Der/кодь: кыланкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+Der/кодь: кыласкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Der/кодь: [кыламкодь, кыламӧйкодь]
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кыламӧкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Der/кодь: кыланныдкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кыладкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+Der/кодь: кыласныкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+Der/кодь: кылікодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+Der/кодь: кылінкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Der/кодь: [кыліскодь, кылікодь]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Der/кодь: [кылімкодь, кылімӧйкодь]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кылімӧкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Der/кодь: кылінныдкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Use/Sub+Der/кодь: кылідкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+Der/кодь: [кылісныкодь, кыліныкодь]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1+Der/кодь: кылӧмакодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+Der/кодь: кылӧмыдкодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+Der/кодь: кылӧмакодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1+Der/кодь: кылӧмаӧськодь
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+Der/кодь: [кылӧмныдкодь, кылӧмныдӧськодь]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+Der/кодь: [кылӧмаӧськодь, кылӧмныкодь]
     кывны+V+Inf+Compar: кывныджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Compar: кыладжык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Compar: кыланджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Compar: кылӧджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Compar: [кыламджык, кыламӧйджык]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Use/Sub+Compar: кыламӧджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Compar: кыланныдджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Use/Sub+Compar: кыладджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Compar: кылӧныджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+Compar: кыладжык
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+Compar: кыланджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+Compar: кыласджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Compar: [кыламджык, кыламӧйджык]
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Use/Sub+Compar: кыламӧджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Compar: кыланныдджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Use/Sub+Compar: кыладджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+Compar: кыласныджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+Compar: кыліджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+Compar: кылінджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Compar: [кылісджык, кыліджык]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Compar: [кылімджык, кылімӧйджык]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Use/Sub+Compar: кылімӧджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Compar: кылінныдджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Use/Sub+Compar: кылідджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+Compar: [кылісныджык, кыліныджык]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1+Compar: кылӧмаджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+Compar: кылӧмыдджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+Compar: кылӧмаджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1+Compar: кылӧмаӧсьджык
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+Compar: [кылӧмныдджык, кылӧмныдӧсьджык]
     кывны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+Compar: [кылӧмаӧсьджык, кылӧмныджык]
     кывны+V+Der/мысьт: кывмысьт
     кывны+V+Der/мысь: кывмысь
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl: кылігъяс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill: кылігъясӧ
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: кылігъясам
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: кылігъясад
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: кылігъясас
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: кылігъясаным
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: кылігъясаныд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: кылігъясаныс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill: кылігӧ
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: кылігам
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: кылігад
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: кылігас
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: кыліганым
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: кыліганыд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: кыліганыс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+NoPoss: кылігъясӧн
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+PxSg2: кылігъясӧныд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+PxSg3: кылігъясӧныс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+PxPl1: кылігъясӧнным
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+PxPl2: кылігъясӧнныд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: кылігъясӧнныс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+NoPoss: кылігӧн
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+PxSg2: кылігӧныд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+PxSg3: кылігӧныс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+PxPl1: кылігӧнным
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+PxPl2: кылігӧнныд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr+PxPl3: кылігӧнныс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+NoPoss: кылігмоз
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+PxSg2: кылігмозыд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+PxSg3: кылігмозыс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+PxPl1: кылігмозным
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+PxPl2: кылігмозныд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз+PxPl3: кылігмозныс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/сор: кылігсор
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/сор+Instr: кылігсорӧн
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тыр: кылігтыр
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+NoPoss: кылігтырйи
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+PxSg2: кылігтырйиыд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+PxSg3: кылігтырйиыс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+PxPl1: кылігтырйиным
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+PxPl2: кылігтырйиныд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи+PxPl3: кылігтырйиныс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тыръя: кылігтыръя
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+NoPoss: кылігчӧж
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+PxSg2: кылігчӧжыд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+PxSg3: кылігчӧжыс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+PxPl1: кылігчӧжным
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+PxPl2: кылігчӧжныд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+PxPl3: кылігчӧжныс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+Instr: кылігчӧжӧн
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+NoPoss: кылігкості
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+PxSg2: кылігкостіыд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+PxSg3: кылігкостіыс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+PxPl1: кылігкостіным
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+PxPl2: кылігкостіныд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості+PxPl3: кылігкостіныс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/коста: кылігкоста
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ: кылігкежлӧ
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxSg2: кылігкежлад
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxSg3: кылігкежлас
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxPl1: кылігкежланым
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxPl2: кылігкежланыд
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxPl3: кылігкежланыс
     кывны+V+ANA+Adv: кылана
     кывны+V+ANAA+Adv: кыланаа
     кывны+V+AN+Der/моз+NoPoss: кыланмоз
     кывны+V+AN+Der/моз+PxSg2: кыланмозыд
     кывны+V+AN+Der/моз+PxSg3: кыланмозыс
     кывны+V+AN+Der/моз+PxPl1: кыланмозным
     кывны+V+AN+Der/моз+PxPl2: кыланмозныд
     кывны+V+AN+Der/моз+PxPl3: кыланмозныс
     кывны+V+Der/ӧм+Event+N+Instr: кылӧмӧн
     кывны+V+Der/тӧдз+NoPoss: кывтӧдз
     кывны+V+Der/тӧдз+PxSg2: кывтӧдзыд
     кывны+V+Der/тӧдз+PxSg3: кывтӧдзыс
     кывны+V+Der/тӧдз+PxPl1: кывтӧдзным
     кывны+V+Der/тӧдз+PxPl2: кывтӧдзныд
     кывны+V+Der/тӧдз+PxPl3: кывтӧдзныс
     кывны+V+Der/мӧн+NoPoss: кывмӧн
     кывны+V+Der/мӧн+PxSg2: кывмӧныд
     кывны+V+Der/мӧн+PxSg3: кывмӧныс
     кывны+V+Der/мӧн+PxPl1: кывмӧнным
     кывны+V+Der/мӧн+PxPl2: кывмӧнныд
     кывны+V+Der/мӧн+PxPl3: кывмӧнныс
     кывны+V+Der/иг+Duration+Ger: кыліг
